Maryland, session 2025, HB1222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–309.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 718
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COVERED INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) IS NOT LAWFULLY PRESENT IN THE UNITED STATES IS THE
SUBJECT OF AN ACTIVE IMMIGRATION DETAINER REQUEST; AND
(II) 1. HAS BEEN CONVICTED ON OR AFTER JUNE 1, 2025,
OF:
A. A CRIME OF VIOLENCE;
B. ANY FELONY;
C. USING A FIREARM IN THE COMMISSION OF A CRIME OF
VIOLENCE UNDER § 4–204(B) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
D. DRIVING UNDER THE INFLUENCE; OR
E. ENGAGING IN CRIMINAL ORGANIZATION ACTIVITY; OR
2. HAS BEEN ISSUED AN INTERPOL NOTICE FOR
CRIMINAL ORGANIZATION ACTIVITY.
(3) “CRIME OF VIOLENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–101 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(4) “CRIMINAL ORGANIZATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–801 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(5) “DRIVING UNDER THE INFLUENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 21–902 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(6) “INTERPOL NOTICE” MEANS A REQUEST ISSUED BY THE
INTERNATIONAL CRIMINAL POLICE ORGANIZATION FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT
WORLDWIDE TO LOCATE AND PROVISIONALLY ARREST A PERSON PENDING
EXTRADITION, SURRENDER, OR SIMILAR LEGAL ACTION.
(B) IF REQUESTED BY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES, AN
EMPLOYEE OR AGENT OF A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL:
(1) DETAIN PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE RELEASE OF A COVERED
INDIVIDUAL FOR UP TO WITHIN 48 HOURS BEFORE THE RELEASE OF THE COVERED
– 3 –

Ch. 718 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
INDIVIDUAL IN ORDER TO FACILITATE THE TRANSFER OF THE INDIVIDUAL TO
FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES; AND
(2) TRANSFER A COVERED INDIVIDUAL TO FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES PROVIDED THAT THE TRANSFER DOES NOT EXTEND THE TIME IN
CUSTODY OF THE COVERED INDIVIDUAL BEYOND THE INDIVIDUAL’S SCHEDULED
RELEASE.
Article – Criminal Procedure
5–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Civil immigration violation” means a violation of federal civil
immigration law.
(3) “Family member” means a relative by blood, adoption, or marriage.
(4) “Household member” means a person who lives with another or is a
regular presence in the home of another.
(5) (i) “Law enforcement agent” means an individual who is certified by
the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission under § 3–209 of the Public
Safety Article.
(ii) “Law enforcement agent” does not include an agent or employee
of a State correctional facility or a local correctional facility.
(6) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article.
(7) “State correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “arrest” does not include a routine booking
procedure.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) [and], (4), AND (5) of this
subsection, a law enforcement agent may not, during the performance of regular police
functions:
(i) inquire about an individual’s citizenship, immigration status, or
place of birth during a stop, a search, or an arrest;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 718
(ii) detain, or prolong the detention of, an individual:
1. for the purpose of investigating the individual’s
citizenship or immigration status; or
2. based on the suspicion that the individual has committed
a civil immigration violation;
(iii) transfer an individual to federal immigration authorities unless
required by federal law; or
(iv) coerce, intimidate, or threaten any individual based on the actual
or perceived citizenship or immigration status of the individual or:
1. the individual’s family member;
2. the individual’s household member;
3. the individual’s legal guardian; or
4. another individual for whom the individual is a legal
guardian.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a law enforcement agent from
inquiring about any information that is material to a criminal investigation.
(4) If the citizenship or immigration status of an individual is relevant to a
protection accorded to the individual under State or federal law, or subject to a requirement
imposed by international treaty, a law enforcement agent may:
(i) notify the individual of the protection or requirement; and
(ii) provide the individual an opportunity to voluntarily disclose the
individual’s citizenship or immigration status for the purpose of receiving the protection or
complying with the requirement.
(5) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “COVERED INDIVIDUAL” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 9–309 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(II) IF REQUESTED BY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES, A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENT SHALL:
1. DETAIN PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE RELEASE OF A
COVERED INDIVIDUAL FOR UP TO WITHIN 48 HOURS BEFORE THE RELEASE OF THE
COVERED INDIVIDUAL TO FACILITATE THE TRANSFER OF THE INDIVIDUAL TO
FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES; AND
– 5 –

Ch. 718 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. TRANSFER A COVERED INDIVIDUAL TO FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES PROVIDED THAT THE TRANSFER DOES NOT EXTEND
THE TIME IN CUSTODY OF THE COVERED INDIVIDUAL BEYOND THE INDIVIDUAL’S
SCHEDULED RELEASE.
5–104.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT”
MEANS A CONTRACT, AN AGREEMENT, AN INTERGOVERNMENTAL SERVICE
AGREEMENT, OR A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT THAT AUTHORIZES THE STATE, A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A
COUNTY SHERIFF, OR ANY AGENCY, OFFICER, EMPLOYEE, OR AGENT OF THE STATE
OR A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO ENFORCE CIVIL IMMIGRATION LAW.
(2) “IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT” INCLUDES AN
AGREEMENT MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH:
(I) 8 U.S.C. § 1103;
(II) 8 U.S.C. § 1357; OR
(III) ANY OTHER FEDERAL LAW.
(B) THE STATE, A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COUNTY SHERIFF, OR
ANY AGENCY, OFFICER, EMPLOYEE, OR AGENT OF THE STATE OR A UNIT OF LOCAL
GOVERNMENT MAY NOT ENTER INTO AN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT.
(C) THE STATE, A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT, A COUNTY SHERIFF, OR
ANY AGENCY, OFFICER, EMPLOYEE, OR AGENT OF THE STATE OR A UNIT OF LOCAL
GOVERNMENT WITH AN EXISTING IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT SHALL
EXERCISE THE TERMINATION PROVISION CONTAINED IN THE IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT NOT LATER THAN JULY 1, 2025.
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–104.
(a) In this section, “federal law enforcement officer” means an officer who may:
(1) make an arrest with or without a warrant for violations of the United
States Code; and
(2) carry firearms in the performance of the officer’s duties.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 718
(c) (1) A federal law enforcement officer who acts under the authority granted
by this section shall notify the following persons of an investigation [or], AN enforcement
action, OR A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION AT A SENSITIVE
LOCATION, AS DEFINED IN § 6–111 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE:
(i) 1. the chief of police, if any, or chief’s designee, when in a
municipal corporation;
2. the police commissioner or police commissioner’s designee,
when in Baltimore City;
3. the chief of police or chief’s designee, when in a county with
a county police department, except Baltimore City;
4. the sheriff or sheriff’s designee, when in a county without a
county police department;
5. the Secretary of Natural Resources or Secretary’s designee,
when on property owned, leased, operated by, or under the control of the Department of
Natural Resources; or
6. the chief of police of the Maryland Transportation
Authority or chief’s designee, when on property owned, leased, operated by, or under the
control of the Maryland Transportation Authority, Maryland Aviation Administration, or
Maryland Port Administration; and
(ii) the Department of State Police barrack commander or
commander’s designee, unless there is an agreement otherwise with the Department of State
Police.
(2) When the federal law enforcement officer participates in a joint
investigation with officials from a State or local law enforcement unit, the federal law
enforcement officer shall give the notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
reasonably in advance.
2–104.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SENSITIVE LOCATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 6–111 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A STATE OR LOCAL
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR A DETENTION FACILITY IN A DISTRICT COURT OR
CIRCUIT COURT HOUSE.
– 7 –

Ch. 718 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A PUBLIC SCHOOL, A PUBLIC LIBRARY, OR A UNIT OF THE
EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT OPERATES AT A
SENSITIVE LOCATION SHALL DENY ACCESS TO ANY PORTION OF THE SENSITIVE
LOCATION THAT IS NOT ACCESSIBLE TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC TO ANY INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS SEEKING ACCESS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENFORCING FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
LAW, UNLESS:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL PRESENTS A VALID WARRANT ISSUED BY A
FEDERAL COURT; OR
(II) EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES EXIST.
Article – General Provisions
4–501.
(a) In this section, “personal record” means a public record that names or, with
reasonable certainty, otherwise identifies an individual by an identifying factor such as:
(1) an address;
(2) a description;
(3) a fingerprint or voice print;
(4) a number; or
(5) a picture.
Article – State Government
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Person” means an individual, receiver, trustee, guardian, personal
representative, fiduciary, or representative of any kind and any partnership, firm,
association, corporation, or other entity.
6–111.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 718
(2) “COLLATERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT” MEANS FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS THAT AFFECT INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE NOT
THE PRIMARY TARGET OF THE ENFORCEMENT ACTION BUT ARE PRESENT AT THE
LOCATION OF THE ENFORCEMENT ACTION.
(3) “IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT” MEANS FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS.
(4) “SENSITIVE LOCATION” MEANS:
(I) A PUBLIC SCHOOL;
(II) A PUBLIC LIBRARY;
(III) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY OPERATED BY A UNIT OF STATE
OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(IV) A FACILITY OPERATED BY THE COMPTROLLER;
(V) A COURTHOUSE; OR
(VI) ANY OTHER LOCATION THAT:
1. PROVIDES STATE–FUNDED SERVICES RELATED TO:
A. PHYSICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH;
B. EDUCATION;
C. SHELTER CARE; OR
D. ACCESS TO JUSTICE; AND
2. AS DETERMINED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL,
REQUIRES SPECIAL CONSIDERATION FOR IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES.
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH GUIDANCE
THAT INFORMS THE PUBLIC AND RELEVANT STATE AGENCIES ABOUT:
(1) DELINEATING BETWEEN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT WITHIN
THE PUBLIC PORTIONS OF SENSITIVE LOCATIONS AND THE NONPUBLIC OR PRIVATE
PORTIONS OF SENSITIVE LOCATIONS;
– 9 –

Ch. 718 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) VERIFYING THE IDENTITY OF IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
AGENTS AND VALIDATING IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT DOCUMENTATION SEEKING
SPECIFIC INDIVIDUALS;
(3) LIMITING LIABILITY EXPOSURE FOR STATE, LOCAL, AND PRIVATE
INSTITUTIONS AND THE PARTICIPATION OF THE EMPLOYEES OF THOSE
INSTITUTIONS IN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT SENSITIVE LOCATIONS;
(4) FACILITATING RELATIONSHIPS BETWEEN FEDERAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND STATE AND LOCAL OFFICIALS AND LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS IN ORDER TO CONDUCT IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
ACTIVITIES THROUGH THE LEAST DANGEROUS AND DISRUPTIVE MEANS; AND
(5) COMPLYING WITH EXISTING LEGAL OBLIGATIONS AND
LIMITATIONS ON STATE AND LOCAL AGENCIES WHILE MAINTAINING PUBLIC SAFETY
AND ACCESSIBILITY TO THOSE AGENCIES.
(C) PRIVATE ENTITIES ARE ENCOURAGED TO ADOPT POLICIES CONSISTENT
WITH THE GUIDANCE DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IF THE
PRIVATE ENTITIES PROVIDE SERVICES RELATED TO:
(1) PHYSICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH;
(2) EDUCATION;
(3) SHELTER CARE; OR
(4) ACCESS TO JUSTICE.
(D) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL, PUBLIC
LIBRARY, AND UNIT OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT
THAT OPERATES AT A SENSITIVE LOCATION SHALL IMPLEMENT A POLICY
CONSISTENT WITH THE GUIDANCE ISSUED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(E) THE GUIDANCE AND POLICIES REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION ARE NOT
SUBJECT TO TITLE 10, SUBTITLES 1, 2, AND 3 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
10–1702.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 718
(2) “GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY” MEANS A UNIT OR INSTRUMENTALITY
OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(3) “PERSONAL RECORD” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–501 OF
THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR BEFORE
JULY 1, 2026, EACH GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH
PROCEDURES THAT PREVENT THE SALE AND REDISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL RECORDS
AND GEOLOCATION DATA PROVIDED OR MADE AVAILABLE BY THE GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY IN A WAY THAT HARMS THE PRIVACY OF RESIDENTS OF THE STATE.
(2) THE PROCEDURES REQUIRED AND PUBLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL ADDRESS:
(I) ANY POSSIBLE CONTRACTUAL LIMITATIONS ON THE SALE OR
REDISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL RECORDS OR GEOLOCATION DATA THAT A
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY MAY PLACE ON A PERSON WHO RECEIVES PERSONAL
RECORDS OR GEOLOCATION DATA THAT ARE PROVIDED OR MADE AVAILABLE BY THE
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
(II) CONSIDERATIONS REGARDING:
1. THE THREAT TO PRIVACY POSED BY DATA BROKERS
WHO UTILIZE PERSONAL RECORDS OR GEOLOCATION DATA FOR COMMERCIAL
PURPOSES;
2. THE RISK THAT PERSONAL RECORDS OR
GEOLOCATION DATA MAY BE USED FOR PURPOSES OTHER THAN THE PURPOSES FOR
WHICH THE PERSONAL RECORDS OR GEOLOCATION DATA WERE DEVELOPED OR
COLLECTED; AND
3. GEOLOCATION, GENETIC, AND OTHER SENSITIVE
DATA; AND
(III) ANY OTHER CONSIDERATIONS NECESSARY TO:
1. PROTECT THE PRIVACY OF RESIDENTS OF THE STATE;
2. DISCOURAGE THE DEVELOPMENT OF A SECONDARY
COMMERCIAL MARKET FOR PERSONAL RECORDS OR GEOLOCATION DATA THAT ARE
PROVIDED OR MADE AVAILABLE BY A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY; AND
– 11 –

Ch. 718 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. LIMIT A PERSON WHO RECEIVES PERSONAL RECORDS
OR GEOLOCATION DATA THAT ARE PROVIDED OR MADE AVAILABLE BY A
GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY FROM SELLING OR REDISCLOSING THE DATA WITH OTHER
PERSONS.
(C) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, EACH GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY SHALL, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, SUBMIT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
A COPY OF THE PROCEDURES DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 12 –